Maine, session 132, LD189.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §330, sub-§6, as enacted by PL 2001, c. 664, §2, is amended to
read:
6. Existing capacity. The use by an ambulatory surgical facility licensed on January
1, 1998 of capacity in existence on January 1, 1998; and
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §330, sub-§7, as amended by PL 2003, c. 621, §1, is further
amended to read:
7. Critical access hospitals. Conversion by a critical access hospital or a hospital in
the process of becoming a critical access hospital of licensed acute care beds to hospital
swing beds.; and
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §330, sub-§8 is enacted to read:
8. Mental health and substance use disorder services. Mental and behavioral health
care services and substance use disorder detoxification and treatment services offered by a
health care facility.